Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1302
Midwestern Higher Education Commission; members; terms; vacancies.

Notwithstanding any provision of Article II of the Midwestern Higher Education Compact, members of the Midwestern Higher Education Commission residing in Nebraska shall be as follows: (1) The Governor or his or her designee who shall serve during the tenure of office of the Governor; (2) two members of the Legislature selected by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council; and (3) two members appointed by the Governor representing higher education, at least one of whom shall be a member of the statewide Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education. The director of such coordinating commission shall serve as an ex officio member of the Midwestern Higher Education Commission. Length of terms of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (3) of this section shall be as provided in Article II of the compact for at-large members. Vacancies shall be filled as provided in such article.

Laws 1991, LB 209, § 2.